Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.110

Pension funding council—Audits required—Select committee on pension policy.

The pension funding council shall solicit and administer a biennial actuarial audit of the preliminary and final actuarial valuations used for employer and member rate-setting purposes. This audit will be conducted concurrent with the actuarial valuation performed by the state actuary. At least once in each six-year period, the pension funding council shall solicit and administer an actuarial audit of the results of the experience study required in RCW 41.45.090. Upon receipt of the results of the preliminary actuarial audits required by this section, and at least thirty days prior to adopting contribution rates, the pension funding council shall submit the results to the select committee on pension policy.

[ 2007 c 280 s 6; 2003 c 295 s 10; 1998 c 283 s 3.]